North Carolina, session 2025, SB77.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-111.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.2. Contracts with private service providers.
(a) Local educational agencies furnishing special education and related services to
children with disabilities may contract with private special education facilities or service
providers to furnish any of these services that the public providers are unable to furnish.services.
(b) As used in this subsection, "nursing services" are services that may only be provided
by nurses licensed in accordance with Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes. When
providing nursing services pursuant to a child's IEP, local educational agencies shall assign the
parent's choice of nurse to provide the nursing services required by the child's IEP if all of the
following apply:
(1) The child received nursing services from the nurse (i) prior to the nursing
services being required by the child's IEP or (ii) prior to the child enrolling in
his or her current school.
(2) The parent's choice of nurse is employed by a nursing agency and willing to
provide the nursing services required by the child's IEP.
(3) The nursing agency employing the parent's choice of nurse is willing to enter
into a contract with the local educational agency that otherwise meets the
standard contract terms required for any other nursing agency contracted by
the local educational agency, including licensing and liability requirements.
(4) The contracted rate is equal to or less than the contracted rate of other nurses
contracted by the local educational agency.
(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the local educational agency's
responsibility to provide a free appropriate public education."
*S77-v-4*

SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 24th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 2 Senate Bill 77-Ratified